Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.120

Monetary penalties—Restitution.

(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty.

(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil infraction shall be $250, not including statutory assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving (i) potentially dangerous litter as specified in *RCW 70A.200.060(4), in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $500; or (ii) a person's refusal to submit to a test or tests pursuant to RCW 79A.60.040 and 79A.60.700, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $1,000; or (iii) the misrepresentation of service animals under RCW 49.60.214, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $500; or (iv) untraceable firearms pursuant to RCW 9.41.326 or unfinished frames or receivers pursuant to RCW 9.41.327, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $500; or (v) the failure to report the loss or theft of a firearm under RCW 9.41.368, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $1,000;

(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil infraction shall be $125, not including statutory assessments;

(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil infraction shall be $50, not including statutory assessments; and

(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil infraction shall be $25, not including statutory assessments.

(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil infractions.

(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.

(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a civil infraction to make restitution.

[ 2024 c 286 s 2; 2023 c 102 s 13; 2022 c 105 s 1; 2021 c 65 s 8; 2018 c 176 s 5; 2013 c 278 s 3. Prior: 2003 c 365 s 3; 2003 c 337 s 4; 1997 c 159 s 2; 1987 c 456 s 20.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 70A.200.060 was amended by 2024 c 231 s 2, changing subsection (4) to subsection (5).

Effective date—2022 c 105: "This act takes effect July 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 105 s 9.]

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Declaration—Finding—Purpose—Effective date—2018 c 176: See notes following RCW 49.60.215.

Findings—2003 c 365: "The legislature finds that there has been an increase in studies showing a correlation between exposure to violent video and computer games and various forms of hostile and antisocial behavior. The entertainment software industry's ratings and content descriptors of video and computer games reflect that some video and computer games are suitable only for adults due to graphic depictions of sex and/or violence. Furthermore, some video and computer games focus on violence specifically against public law enforcement officers such as police and firefighters. The legislature encourages retailers and parents to utilize the rating system.

In addition, the legislature finds there is a compelling interest to curb hostile and antisocial behavior in Washington's youth and to foster respect for public law enforcement officers." [ 2003 c 365 s 1.]

Findings—2003 c 337: See note following RCW 70A.200.060.